Utah statutes.
31A-19a-211.   Premium rate reduction for seniors -- Motor vehicle accident
prevention course -- Curriculum -- Certificate -- Exception.
(1) (a)  Each rate, rating schedule, and rating manual for the liability,
personal injury protection, and collision coverages of private passenger motor
vehicle insurance policies submitted to or filed with the commissioner shall
provide for an appropriate reduction in premium charges for those coverages if
the principal operator of the covered vehicle:
(i)  is a named insured who is 55 years of age or older; and
(ii)  has successfully completed a motor vehicle accident prevention course as
outlined in Subsection (2).
(b)  Any premium reduction provided by an insurer under this section is
presumed to be appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise.
(2) (a)  The curriculum for a motor vehicle accident prevention course under
this section shall include:
(i)  how impairment of visual and audio perception affects driving performance
and how to compensate for that impairment;
(ii)  the effects of fatigue, medications, and alcohol on driving performance,
when experienced alone or in combination, and precautionary measures to
prevent or offset ill effects;
(iii)  updates on rules of the road and equipment, including safety belts and
safe, efficient driving techniques under present day road and traffic
conditions;
(iv)  how to plan travel time and select routes for safety and efficiency; and
(v)  how to make crucial decisions in dangerous, hazardous, and unforeseen
situations.
(b) (i)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the Department of Public Safety may make rules to establish
and clarify standards pertaining to the curriculum and teaching methods of a
course under this section.
(ii)  These rules may include provisions allowing the department to conduct
on-site visits to ensure compliance with agency rules and this chapter.
(iii)  These rules shall be specific as to time and manner of visits and
provide for methods to prohibit or remedy forcible visits.
(3) (a)  The premium reduction required by this section shall be effective for
a named insured for a three-year period after successful completion of the
course outlined in Subsection (2).
(b)  The insurer may require, as a condition of maintaining the premium
reduction, that the named insured not be convicted or plead guilty or nolo
contendere to a moving traffic violation for which points may be assessed
against the named insured's driver license except for a violation under
Subsection 53-3-221(12).
(4)  Each person who successfully completes the course outlined in Subsection
(2) shall be issued a certificate by the organization offering the course.
The certificate qualifies the person for the premium reduction required by
this section.
(5)  This section does not apply if the approved course outlined in Subsection
(2) is attended as a penalty imposed by a court or other governmental entity
for a moving traffic violation.
